Idaho, session 2025, H0300.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-516, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-516. LEGISLATIVE INTENT: DIG ONCE POLICY. (1) It is the intent of
the legislature to recognize that the citizens of the state live and work in
a data-driven society and that the connectivity in Idaho's urban and rural
areas are key for a thriving Idaho economy. Broadband is a vital component in
accomplishing connectivity throughout Idaho.
(2) The legislature recognizes and hereby declares that broadband ser-
vice throughout the entire state is in the overall public interest for the
state of Idaho in furtherance of the social and economic development of the
state, and the use of highway rights-of-way to support broadband infrastruc-
ture and a "Dig Once Policy" furthers the overall public interest.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the Idaho transportation
department develop rules, standards, and policies consistent with the "Dig
Once Policy" to facilitate the expansion of broadband with the cost-effi-
cient, orderly, and coordinated installation of broadband infrastructure on
highway rights-of-way and during roadway construction.
(4) It is also the intent of the legislature that single county-wide
highway districts formed pursuant to chapter 14, title 40, Idaho Code, de-
velop nondiscriminatory and competitively neutral rules, standards, and
policies consistent with the "Dig Once Policy" to facilitate the expansion
of broadband with the cost-efficient, orderly, and coordinated installation
of broadband infrastructure on highway rights-of-way and during roadway
construction.
SECTION 2. That Section 40-517, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-517. DEFINITIONS. As used in sections 40-515 through 40-520, Idaho
Code:
(1) "Broadband" means wide bandwidth communication transmissions al-
lowing high speed internet access with an ability to simultaneously trans-
port multiple signals and traffic types at a minimum transmission speed of


one hundred (100) megabits per second for downloads and twenty (20) megabits
per second for uploads.
(2) "Broadband infrastructure" means networks of deployed telecommu-
nications equipment, conduit, and technologies necessary to provide broad-
band and other advanced telecommunications services to wholesalers or end
users, including but not limited to private homes, businesses, commercial
establishments, schools, or public institutions.
(3) "Broadband provider" means any entity that:
(a) Provides broadband services, including but not limited to a
telecommunications provider, cable service provider, broadband
provider, cellular provider, political subdivision that provides
broadband services, electric cooperative that provides broadband
services, electric utility that provides broadband services, state
government entity that provides broadband services, tribal government
that provides broadband services, or internet service provider; or
(b) Builds broadband infrastructure, including but not limited to a
port, nonprofit organization, or private-public partnership estab-
lished for the purpose of expanding broadband in the state.
(4) "Department" means the Idaho transportation department.
(5) "Dig Once Policy" means a policy or practice that minimizes the
number and scale of excavations or construction and costs when installing
broadband infrastructure in highway rights-of-way.
(6) "District" means a single county-wide highway district formed pur-
suant to chapter 14, title 40, Idaho Code.
(6) (7) "Highway" means a road that is part of the state or district
highway system.
(7) (8) "Longitudinal access" means access to or use of any part of a
right-of-way of a highway that extends generally parallel to the right-of-
way for a total of one hundred (100) or more linear feet.
SECTION 3. That Section 40-518, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-518. DIG ONCE POLICY NOTIFICATION AND PROJECT IDENTIFICATION. (1)
The department and district shall develop on a competitively neutral basis
a registry of broadband providers interested in installing broadband infra-
structure along a highway. The department and district shall update the reg-
istry no less than once per year.
(2) The department and district shall identify potential projects man-
aged by the department or district, either self-performed by the department
or district or performed under contract, on highways under the department's
or district's jurisdiction for which notice under subsection (3) of this
section is required. Potential projects eligible for identification shall
include projects that involve the construction of underground infrastruc-
ture, road construction, or other work that will result in longitudinal
access that could reasonably include, or prepare for, the installation of
broadband infrastructure consistent with the "Dig Once Policy."
(3) For each project identified under subsection (2) of this section,
the department or district shall timely notify the broadband providers on
the registry established under subsection (1) of this section:


(a) That the project has been identified as suitable for coordination
with broadband providers;
(b) Of the broadband provider's opportunity to coordinate with the de-
partment or district to accommodate the installation of broadband in-
frastructure; and
(c) Of the process for submitting a statement of interest to coordinate
with the department or district on the project.
(4) The department or district shall provide each broadband provider
that receives a notice under subsection (3) of this section no less than
thirty (30) days from the date the notice is issued to submit to the depart-
ment or district a statement of interest to coordinate with the department
or district.
(5) For each project for which the department or district provides no-
tice under this section, the department or district shall engage with each
broadband provider that submits a statement of interest to determine whether
accommodation of installation of broadband infrastructure is appropriate.
(6) The department or district shall make the final determination of
the suitability of a project to include installation of broadband infra-
structure and may prescribe any conditions, requirements, restrictions,
or other provisions in furtherance of the "Dig Once Policy." Conditions,
requirements, restrictions, or provisions prescribed pursuant to this
subsection may include but need not be limited to liability provisions, re-
quirements related to the financial responsibilities for future relocation
of broadband infrastructure if relocation is necessary, and indemnifica-
tion provisions. The department or district may deny the installation of
broadband infrastructure if the installation hinders or obstructs highway
construction, maintenance, or operational safety, is contrary to statute or
rule, or unduly delays or interferes with construction, maintenance, joint
trenching projects, or the repair or construction of water, wastewater,
electrical, or gas line facilities.
(7) The department may install conduit for its own use where appro-
priate or in support of expanding broadband infrastructure in the state of
Idaho.
(8) The department and district shall promulgate and follow rules for
carrying out the provisions of this section that are nondiscriminatory, neu-
tral, fair, and objective as between all broadband providers and that pro-
mote competition among broadband providers. Rules shall include, at a mini-
mum:
(a) Procedures consistent with the "Dig Once Policy" for processing and
reviewing statements of interest received from a broadband provider by
the department or district. Consistent with the "Dig Once Policy," the
department or district shall issue rules that will restrict speculative
practices that may unduly impact and congest the department's rights-
of-way;
(b) A requirement that a broadband provider shall be charged for the
actual cost incurred by the department or district as a result of the
installation of a broadband provider's broadband infrastructure. If
there is more than one (1) broadband provider installing broadband
infrastructure, then each broadband provider shall share equally in
the common charges of the installation of broadband infrastructure,


including but not limited to trenching, boring, traffic controls, and
make-ready costs;
(c) Criteria for identifying projects that would be suitable for the
placement of broadband infrastructure;
(d) Criteria for the installation of the department's own conduit.
Rules may allow use of such conduit by broadband providers;
(e) Procedures and forms for permitting processes; and
(f) A contested case administrative appeals process, pursuant to the
Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(9) The department or district may not grant any longitudinal access
under this section that results in a significant compromise of the safe, ef-
ficient, and convenient use of a highway for the traveling public.
SECTION 4. That Section 40-520, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-520. RIGHTS-OF-WAY FOR BROADBAND. (1) Except as provided in sub-
section (5) of this section, the department or district shall allow a broad-
band provider longitudinal use and access to the rights-of-way of a highway
for the installation, operation, and maintenance of broadband infrastruc-
ture.
(2) The department or district shall enter into a license agreement
with a broadband provider and issue a permit before granting it any longi-
tudinal access under this section. Except as specifically provided by the
agreement, a property interest in a right-of-way may not be granted under the
provisions of this section. An agreement entered into by the department or
district under this section:
(a) Shall include terms and conditions that are nondiscriminatory as
among broadband providers and are consistent with the public policy
promoting the expansion of broadband infrastructure in Idaho, such as
liability provisions, requirements related to the financial responsi-
bilities for future relocation of underground broadband infrastructure
if relocation is necessary, and indemnification provisions;
(b) Shall specify maintenance responsibilities for broadband infra-
structure being placed;
(c) May require that the department be allowed to utilize the broadband
infrastructure only for public safety warnings, road condition notifi-
cations, and amber alerts to motorists on highways;
(d) May With respect to the department, the agreement may require that
the broadband provider install conduit for nonexclusive use, in which
the cost of the project shall be shared proportionally. Alternatively,
if the department requires the broadband provider to install only one
(1) conduit of equal or smaller size of the conduit being installed ex-
clusively for internal department purposes, then the department shall
be responsible only for the costs of the additional materials and labor
for the installation of its own conduit. The department must keep all
documents and records regarding the internal use of the conduit and make
public such documents if requested. The department may not allow the
use of its internal conduit to any other entity. If the department al-
lows the use of internal conduit to another entity, then the department
shall reimburse the broadband provider for half of the project costs;


(e) Shall specify that the broadband provider shall own its broadband
infrastructure; and
(f) Shall specify that the use of the rights-of-way shall be nonexclu-
sive.
(3) A broadband provider shall be responsible for the costs of in-
stalling its own broadband infrastructure on the department's or the
district's right-of-way. If there is more than one (1) broadband provider
installing broadband infrastructure at the same project, then the broadband
provider is responsible for its pro rata share of the cost.
(4) The department shall require the same fees from a broadband
provider under this section for longitudinal access to the right-of-way as
a public utility defined under section 61-129, Idaho Code. However, fees
charged to a cable provider shall be in accordance with applicable federal
law.
(5) The department or district may not grant any longitudinal access
under this section that results in a significant compromise of the safe, ef-
ficient, and convenient use of a highway for the traveling public.
(6) The department may install conduit for its own use where appro-
priate or in support of expanding broadband infrastructure in the state of
Idaho.
(7) The department and district shall promulgate rules:
(a) Governing the installation, operation, and maintenance of broad-
band infrastructure granted longitudinal access pursuant to this sec-
tion;
(b) Specifying the procedures for establishing an agreement for longi-
tudinal access for a broadband provider;
(c) Specifying criteria for the installation of the department's own
conduit and use of such conduit by broadband providers consistent with
this section. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to the
department; and
(d) Providing for the relocation or removal of broadband infrastruc-
ture for needed changes to a highway on the interstate system.
(8) Nothing in section 40-515, Idaho Code, through this section is in-
tended to preempt, diminish, or otherwise limit the authority of the depart-
ment or district over public rights-of-way.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.